Tennessee, session 114, SB0704.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 65, Chapter 15, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
65-15-312. Criminal impersonation of a transportation network company driver.
(a) It is an offense for a person to:
(1) Impersonate a transportation network company driver by making a
false statement, using a false display of distinctive signage or emblem known as
a trade dress, trademark, branding, or logo of the transportation network
company, or committing another act that falsely represents that the person has a
current connection with a transportation network company; or
(2) Falsely represent that the person is responding to a passenger ride
request for a transportation network company.
(b) A violation of subsection (a) is a Class B misdemeanor; provided, that if the
violation occurs during the commission of a separate felony offense, then a violation of
subsection (a) is a Class E felony.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 7, Chapter 51, Part 10, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
7-51-1009. Criminal impersonation of a private passenger-for-hire vehicle driver.
(a) As used in this section, a "passenger-for-hire vehicle":
(1) Means a motor vehicle that:
SB0704
002658
- 1 -

(A) Is designed or constructed to accommodate and transport not
more than fourteen (14) passengers for hire, exclusive of the driver;
(B) Principally operates within the corporate limits of cities and
suburban territory adjacent to the cities; and
(C) That is not operated on a fixed route or schedule;
(2) Includes a taxicab, limousine, or sedan, as defined in § 7-51-1007;
and
(3) Does not include a personal vehicle used in conjunction with a
transportation network company under title 65, chapter 15, part 3.
(b) It is an offense for a person to:
(1) Impersonate a passenger-for-hire vehicle driver by making a false
statement, using a false display of distinctive signage or emblem known as a
trade dress, trademark, branding, or logo of a passenger-for-hire vehicle, or any
other act that falsely represents that the person has a current connection with a
passenger-for-hire vehicle service; or
(2) Falsely represent that the person is responding to a passenger ride
request for a passenger-for-hire vehicle.
(c) A violation of subsection (b) is a Class B misdemeanor.
(d) If theft of a passenger-for-hire vehicle has occurred as described in § 39-14-
103, then this section does not apply to the owner of the passenger-for-hire vehicle.
SECTION 3. The headings in this act are for reference purposes only and do not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the headings in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to acts committed on or after that date.
- 2 - 002658